public/dictionaries/v2/es_inclusive.aff
SET UTF-8
TRY esianrtolcdugmphbyfvkwzESIANRTOLCDUGMPHBYFVKWZ

SFX E Y 5
SFX E o e o
SFX E a e a
SFX E os es os
SFX E as es as
SFX E 0 es [^aeos]

PFX I N 1
PFX I 0 in .

SFX T Y 3
SFX T o e o
SFX T a e a
SFX T 0 e [^ao]
