public/dictionaries/v2/es_inclusive.dic
20
tode/E
amigue/E
niñe/E
nosotres
vosotres
elles
estudiante/E
compañere/E
profesore/E
ciudadane/E
trabajadore/E
humane/E
queride/E
tíe/E
abogade/E
médique/E
artiste/E
alumne/E
escritore/E
diputade/E
